Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 12 Soft Drinks

Cross references.

Imposition of penalty authorized in lieu of other action, §

2-2-10

.

Law reviews.

For note, “Beer, Liquor, or a Little Bit of Both? Getting to the Bottom of Properly Classifying Flavored Malt Beverages in the United States and Australia,” see 39 Ga. J. Int’l & Comp. L. 471 (2011).

26-2-350.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Bottled soft drink” means all nonalcoholic beverages, whether carbonated or not, such as soda water, carbonated water, orangeade, lemonade, fruit juice when any plain or carbonated water, flavoring, or syrup is added, or any and all preparations commonly referred to as “soft drinks” of whatever kind, which are closed and sealed in glass, paper, metal, or any other type of container or bottle, whether manufactured with or without the use of any syrup. This term shall not include fluid milk to which no flavoring has been added, or natural undiluted fruit or vegetable juice but shall include these drinks when mixed with any syrup, flavoring, water, or additive.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Person” means any person, firm, corporation, association, or any combination thereof.

“Soft drink syrup” means the compound mixture or the basic ingredients, whether dry or liquid, practically and commercially usable in making, mixing, or compounding soft drinks at soda fountains by the mixing thereof with carbonated or plain water, ice, fruit, milk, or any other product suitable to make a soft drink, or any such syrup used in the manufacture, bottling, or distribution of a bottled soft drink.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 1.

26-2-351.
License for manufacture and bottling; separate license for each business or bottling or manufacturing plant.

In addition to complying with the food laws of this state, no person shall manufacture or bottle any soft drink or soft drink syrup within this state unless he or she has a current food sales establishment license from the Commissioner.

Each place of business or bottling or manufacturing plant shall be required to obtain a separate license.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 2; Ga. L. 2007, p. 103, § 3/HB 112.

26-2-352.
Sanitary standards and specifications for manufacture, bottling, and distribution of soft drinks or soft drink syrup; adoption; compliance with food laws.

The Commissioner is charged with the enforcement of this article and is authorized to adopt sanitary standards and specifications for the manufacture, bottling, and distribution of a bottled soft drink or a soft drink syrup. No person shall manufacture, bottle, or distribute any bottled soft drink or soft drink syrup that has been produced, manufactured, bottled, or distributed under sanitary conditions and specifications that are less than those adopted by the Commissioner; provided, however, that such standards and specifications shall be no less than those adopted pursuant to the food laws of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 3.

26-2-353.
Promulgation of rules and regulations; administrative personnel.

The Commissioner is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to effectuate this article. He shall employ the necessary personnel and fix their compensation to assist him in the administration of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 4.

26-2-354.
Suspension or revocation of license; hearing.

Any license issued pursuant to this article may be suspended or revoked by the Commissioner for the violation of this article or of any of the sanitary standards and specifications or rules and regulations issued pursuant to this article. The Commissioner shall notify the person whose license is to be suspended or revoked, by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, of his intent to suspend or revoke the license and shall afford such person a hearing before him, within ten days after receipt of the notice, to show cause why the license should not be suspended or revoked.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 5; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

26-2-355.
Sanitary inspection of building, area, structure, plant, or vehicle used in manufacture, bottling, or distribution.

The Commissioner or his authorized representatives shall have access, at any reasonable hour, to any building, area, structure, plant, or vehicle used in the manufacture, bottling, or distribution of a bottled soft drink or soft drink syrup to inspect sanitary conditions therein.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 6.

26-2-356.
Applicability of article to dairy or milk processing or distributing plants otherwise licensed.

Any dairy or milk processing or distributing plant licensed under other laws of this state shall not be required to obtain the license provided for in this article but shall be subject to all other provisions of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 8.

26-2-357.
Penalty.

Any person who violates this article or any sanitary standard or specification or rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 611, § 7.